Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2306.   Penalties.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), in addition to any penalty contained in any other provision of law, a public officer or public employee who intentionally violates a provision of Section 63G-6a-2304.5, or Section 63G-6a-2305 shall be dismissed from employment or removed from office.

(2)  An elected official who intentionally violates a provision of Section 63G-6a-2304.5, or Section 63G-6a-2305 may only be removed from office in accordance with the requirements of law relating to removal of the elected official from office.

(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), a public officer or public employee who intentionally violates a provision of this chapter is subject to disciplinary action, up to and including dismissal from employment or dismissal from office.

(4)  An elected official who intentionally violates a provision of this chapter may only be disciplined or removed from office in accordance with the requirements of law relating to discipline of the elected official or removal of the elected official from office.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

